Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1145.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 12PUBLIC TRANSIT SECURITY GRANT PROGRAMSec.1201. Definitions.1202. Grant program.1203. Public Transit Security Grant Program Fund.1204. Applications.1205. Award of program grants.1206. Reports.123456789101112131415161718 § 1201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant." Any of the following:(1) The governing body of a municipality or an instrumentality of a municipality.(2) A Commonwealth agency or instrumentality.(3) A local or regional public transit authority.(4) An association representing public transit providers."Fund." The Public Transit Security Grant Program Fund established under section 1203 (relating to Public Transit Security Grant Program Fund)."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township or home rule, optional plan or optional charter municipality, any other general purpose unit of government established by the General Assembly, a municipal authority and any entity formed under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 23 Subch. A (relating to intergovernmental cooperation)."Program." The Public Transit Security Grant Program established under section 1202 (relating to grant program)."Program grant." A grant awarded under the program."Safety committee." As defined under 49 CFR 673.5 (relating to definitions).§ 1202. Grant program.(a) Establishment.--The Public Transit Security Grant Program is established as a competitive grant program within the 20250HB1145PN1266 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of the program is to award grants to eligible applicants for the prevention, reduction or mitigation of the effects of crime relating to public transit operations or for the improvement of public transit employee safety.(c) Administration.--The department shall administer the program.(d) Public notice.--The department shall provide information regarding the availability and award of program grant money on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 1203. Public Transit Security Grant Program Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Public Transit Security Grant Program Fund is established in the State Treasury.(b) Continuing appropriation.--The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for program grants.§ 1204. Applications.(a) Forms.--The department shall develop annual grant application forms for an eligible applicant to apply for a program grant. At a minimum, the forms shall contain the following information:(1) The name, address and contact information of the applicant.(2) The amount of program grant money requested.(3) The proposed use for the requested program grant money.(4) If applicable, a detailed maintenance plan for any equipment used or installed with the requested program grant money.20250HB1145PN1266 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) If applicable, a written letter of support for the application from the safety committee.(6) Other information that the department deems necessary and appropriate.(b) Application period.--Beginning no later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall begin accepting and processing applications for program grants. For all subsequent years, the department shall establish an application period during which applications for program grants are accepted.§ 1205. Award of program grants.(a) Review.--After review of the information provided under each applicant's submitted application form, the department shall determine whether to award a program grant to the applicant and, if so, the amount of the program grant.(b) Allocation.--The department shall determine the allocation limit for program grants, which may not be in excess of the amount in the fund.(c) Competitive nature of awards.--Program grants shall be awarded on a competitive basis to eligible applicants. In awarding program grants, the department shall:(1) Give preference to applicants whose program grant proposals demonstrate the greatest likelihood of preventing, reducing or mitigating the effects of crime relating to public transit operations or of improving the safety of public transit employees.(2) Consider the scope of a proposal and the applicant's demonstrated need for additional resources to effectively prevent or reduce crime relating to public transit operations or improve the safety of public transit employees.20250HB1145PN1266 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Give preference to applicants that demonstrate support and consent of associations representing the majority of public transit employees in the transit authority.(d) Time periods.--(1) The department shall approve or deny an application for a program grant no later than 60 days after the receipt of the application.(2) If the department fails to approve or deny the application within 60 days after the receipt of the application, the application shall be deemed denied.(e) Notice.--(1) The department shall provide written notice to the applicant of the award or denial of the program grant.(2) The notice under paragraph (1) shall include:(i) If awarded, the amount of the program grant and any condition or restriction on the use of the program grant money.(ii) If denied in full or in part, the reason for the full or partial denial.§ 1206. Reports.No less than once every three years, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the General Assembly on the administration of the program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) the total number of program grants awarded;(2) the name and address of each applicant that was awarded a program grant; and(3) the use and the amount of each program grant awarded.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1145PN1266 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930